Vermont statutes. Title 2 Legislature
Chapter 16. Office of Legislative Operations

§ 551.
Creation and purpose.

The Office of Legislative Operations is created as a permanent agency to serve the members and employees of the General Assembly with nonpartisan operational, financial, committee support, and other administrative services and to support the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 552.
Director; employees.

The Joint Legislative Management Committee shall employ an individual with experience and expertise in administration or management to be the Director of Legislative Operations. The Committee may conduct the hiring process itself or it may delegate this duty to a special hiring committee comprising an equal number of members from the House and Senate, not all of whom shall be from the same political party; however, the Joint Legislative Management Committee shall make the final hiring decision.

The Director of Legislative Operations shall employ administrative, committee services, and other professional staff as needed to carry out the duties of the Office of Legislative Operations, except that requests for new, permanent positions shall be subject to the approval of the Joint Legislative Management Committee.
(b) (1) The Director of Legislative Operations shall employ administrative, committee services, and other professional staff as needed to carry out the duties of the Office of Legislative Operations, except that requests for new, permanent positions shall be subject to the approval of the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

All individuals employed by the Office of Legislative Operations shall be subject to the personnel policies adopted by the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

The provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 13 (classification of State personnel) shall not apply to employees of the Office of Legislative Operations.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 553.
Functions.

The Office of Legislative Operations shall provide:

administrative support to the Joint Legislative Management Committee;

administrative support to other standing and interim legislative committees;

payroll, billing, and expense reimbursement services to members of the General Assembly and, as needed, to other legislative offices and legislative employees; and

other administrative and operational services as needed to support members of the General Assembly, legislative offices, and legislative employees.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 554.
Budget.

The Director of Legislative Operations shall propose a budget for the Office of Legislative Operations to the Joint Legislative Management Committee.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 555.
Intergovernmental cooperation.

For the purposes of carrying out its duties, the Office of Legislative Operations shall have access to and the right to copy any public record of all executive, administrative, and judicial departments of the State, except income and franchise tax returns and other documents classified as confidential by law.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.